Hawaii statutes.
[§5-19] Description of the Hawaiian flag.
The official description of the Hawaiian flag as authorized to represent the
State of Hawaii on land and sea, and authorized for executive state agencies,
second to the stars and stripes of the United States shall be:

(1) The Hawaiian flag shall consist of eight
horizontal stripes, alternately white, red, blue, etc., beginning at the top,
having a jack cantoned in the dexter chief angle next to the point of
suspension;

(2) The jack shall consist of a blue field charged
with a compound saltire (crossing) of alternate tincture white and red, the
white having precedence; a narrow edge of white borders each red side of the
saltire;

(3) A red cross bordered with white is charged
(placed) over all;

(4) The proportion shall be as follows:

(A) The fly (length) is twice the hoist
(width);

(B) The jack is half the hoist (width) in
breadth and 7-16 the fly in length;

(C) The arms of the red cross with border
shall be equal in width to one of the horizontal stripes; the white border
shall be one-third the width of the red cross;

(D) The arms of the compound saltire
(crossing) are equal in width to the red cross, the tinctures white, red, and
the border being in the proportion of 3, 2, 1, respectively.

When the Hawaiian flag is flown from the same
halyard as the flag of the United States of America is flown, it shall be
underneath the national colors.

The Hawaiian flag shall not be used to cover a
platform or speaker's desk, nor to drape over the front of a speaker's
platform.

When the Hawaiian flag and the flag of the
United States of America are displayed on a speaker's platform at the same
time, the Hawaiian flag shall be on the left side of the speaker, the speaker's
left, while the flag of the United States of America is on the right side of
the speaker, the speaker's right.

When the Hawaiian flag is used to cover a
casket, it shall be so placed that the jack is at the head and over the left
shoulder. The flag shall not be lowered into the grave or allowed to touch the
ground.

To fold the Hawaiian flag ceremoniously, first
fold it lengthwise, bringing the striped half up over the jack. Then repeat,
with the jack on the outside. Beginning at the lower right, make a series of
triangular folds until the flag resembles a cocked hat with only the jack
visible.

The Hawaiian flag shall be flown at half-mast
by first raising it to the top of the flagpole, and then slowly lowering it to
a position one-fourth of the distance down the flagpole, and there leaving it
during the time it is to be displayed. In taking the flag down, it shall first
be raised to the top of the flagpole, and then slowly lowered with appropriate
ceremony.

When the Hawaiian flag is in such condition of
repair that it is no longer a suitable emblem for displaying, it shall be
totally destroyed, preferably by burning, and that privately; or this shall be
done by some other method in keeping with the spirit of respect and reverence
that all owe the emblem that represents the Aloha State of Hawaii. [L 1990, c
215, pt of §2]

Note

The former Hawaiian flag is described in L 1896, c 10 and CL
§23.

Cross References

State flag, see Const. art. XV, §3.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next